sk-SK: Softvér > Počítačový softvér: Antivírusový a bezpečnostný softvér; Softvér umelej inteligencie (AI); Softvér pre obchod a produktivitu; Kompilátory a programovacie nástroje; Pomocné programy a softvér na údržbu počítača; Slovník a prekladový softvér; Vzdelávací softvér; Finančný, daňový a účtovný softvér; Dáta a softvér GPS máp; Softvér pre vreckové počítače a PDA; Softvér pre multimédiá a dizajn; Sieťový softvér; Kancelársky aplikačný softvér; Operačné systémy; Obnovovacie disky
zh-CN: 软件 > 电脑软件: 防病毒与安全软件; 人工智能 (AI) 软件; 商务软件和办公软件; 编程工具/编译器; 计算机实用软件与维护软件; 字典与翻译软件; 教育软件; 财务/税务/会计软件; GPS 地图数据和软件; 手持设备/PDA 软件; 多媒体和设计软件; 网络软件; 办公应用软件; 操作系统; 磁盘恢复
sl-SI: Programska oprema > Računalniška programska oprema: Protivirusna in varnostna programska oprema; Programska oprema za umetno inteligenco (UI); Programska oprema za poslovanje in produktivnost; Prevajalniki in programska orodja; Programska oprema za računalniške pripomočke in vzdrževanje; Programska oprema za slovarje in prevajanje; Izobraževalna programska oprema; Finančna, davčna in računovodska programska oprema; Podatki in programska oprema za zemljevide GPS; Programska oprema za ročne naprave in dlančnike; Programska oprema za večpredstavnost in oblikovanje; Omrežna programska oprema; Programska oprema pisarniških aplikacij; Operacijski sistemi; Obnovitveni pogoni
sv: Programvara > Datorprogramvara: Antivirus och säkerhetsprogram; Programvara för artificiell intelligens (AI); Företags- och produktivitetsprogram; Kompilatorer och programmeringsverktyg; Datorverktyg och underhållsprogramvara; Ordlistor och program för översättning; Utbildningsprogramvara; Program för finans, skatt och bokföring; GPS-kartdata och GPS-program; Program för handdatorer; Program för multimedia och design; Nätverksprogramvara; Kontorspaket; Operativsystem; Återställningsdiskar
ja: ソフトウェア > PCソフト: セキュリティ・ウイルス対策ソフト; 人工知能 (AI) ソフトウェア; ビジネスソフト; コンパイラ・プログラミングツール; PCユーティリティ・メンテナンスソフト; 辞書・翻訳ソフト; 教育・学習ソフト; 税務・会計ソフト; GPS地図ソフト; PDAソフト; マルチメディアソフト; ネットワークソフト; オフィスアプリケーション; オペレーティングシステム; リカバリーディスク
hr-HR: Softver > Računalni softver: Antivirusni i sigurnosni softver; Softver za umjetnu inteligenciju (AI); Softver za poslovanje i produktivnost; Kompilatori i alati za programiranje; Računalni pomoćni programi i softver za održavanje; Softver za rječnik i prijevod; Softver za obrazovanje; Softver za financije, porez i računovodstvo; Softver za GPS kartografske podatke; Ručni i PDA softver; Softver za multimediju i dizajn; Mrežni softver; Uredski aplikacijski softver; Operativni sustavi; Oporavak diskova
en: Software > Computer Software: Antivirus & Security Software; Artificial Intelligence (AI) Software; Business & Productivity Software; Compilers & Programming Tools; Computer Utilities & Maintenance Software; Dictionary & Translation Software; Educational Software; Financial, Tax & Accounting Software; GPS Map Data & Software; Handheld & PDA Software; Multimedia & Design Software; Network Software; Office Application Software; Operating Systems; Restore Disks
pl: Oprogramowanie > Programy komputerowe: Programy antywirusowe i zabezpieczające; Oprogramowanie sztucznej inteligencji (AI); Programy dla firm i do pracy; Kompilatory i narzędzia programistyczne; Programy pomocnicze i konserwacyjne; Słowniki i translatory; Programy edukacyjne; Programy finansowe, podatkowe i księgowe; Mapy i programy do nawigacji GPS; Programy na palmtopy i urządzenia PDA; Programy do multimediów i projektowania; Programy sieciowe; Programy biurowe; Systemy operacyjne; Dyski ratunkowe
ko: 소프트웨어 > 컴퓨터 소프트웨어: 바이러스 방지/보안 소프트웨어; 인공지능(AI) 소프트웨어; 비즈니스/생산성 소프트웨어; 컴파일러/프로그래밍 도구; 컴퓨터 유틸리티/관리 소프트웨어; 사전/번역 소프트웨어; 교육용 소프트웨어; 재무/세금/회계 소프트웨어; GPS 지도 데이터/소프트웨어; 휴대용 기기/PDA 소프트웨어; 멀티미디어/디자인 소프트웨어; 네트워크 소프트웨어; 사무용 소프트웨어; 운영체제; 복원 디스크
tr: Yazılım > Bilgisayar Yazılımları: Antivirüs ve Güvenlik Yazılımları; Yapay Zeka (AI) Yazılımı; İş ve Verimlilik Yazılımları; Derleme ve Programlama Araçları; Bilgisayar Yardımcı Araçları ve Bakım Yazılımları; Sözlük ve Çeviri Yazılımları; Eğitim Yazılımları; Finans, Vergi ve Muhasebe Yazılımları; GPS Harita Verileri ve Yazılımları; Taşınabilir Cihaz ve PDA Yazılımları; Multimedya ve Tasarım Yazılımları; Ağ Yazılımları; Ofis Uygulama Yazılımları; İşletim Sistemleri; Geri Yükleme Diskleri
it: Software > Software per computer: Software antivirus e sicurezza; Software di intelligenza artificiale (IA).; Software per le aziende e la produttività; Strumenti compilazione/programmazione; Software di manutenzione e utility PC; Software traduzione e dizionari; Software educativo; Software per tasse; Dati e software per mappe GPS; Software palmari e PDA; Software contenuti multimediali e progettazione; Software di rete; Software applicativo per ufficio; Sistemi operativi; Dischi di ripristino
cs: Software > Počítačový software: Antivirový a bezpečnostní software; Software pro umělou inteligenci (AI); Pracovní a produktivní software; Kompilátory a vývojářské nástroje; Softwarové nástroje a údržba počítačů; Slovníkový a překladový software; Výukový software; Finanční, daňový a účetní software; Mapová data a software GPS; Software pro handheldy a PDA; Multimediální software; Síťový software; Kancelářský software; Operační systémy; Disky pro obnovení systému
de: Software > Computersoftware: Antiviren- & Sicherheitssoftware; Künstliche Intelligenz(KI)-Software; Unternehmens- & Produktivitätssoftware; Compiler & Programmierungstools; Computerdienstprogramme & -wartung; Wörterbuch- & Übersetzungssoftware; Lernsoftware; Steuer- & Buchhaltungssoftware; GPS-Karten & -Software; Handheld- & PDA-Software; Software für Multimedia & Design; Netzwerksoftware; Büroanwendungssoftware; Betriebssysteme; Wiederherstellungsdatenträger
hu: Szoftver > Számítógépes szoftver: Vírusirtó és biztonsági szoftver; Mesterséges intelligencia (AI) szoftver; Üzleti és termelékenységi szoftver; Fordítók és programozási eszközök; Számítógépes segédprogramok és karbantartó szoftverek; Szótár és fordító szoftver; Oktatási szoftver; Pénzügyi, adózási és számviteli szoftver; GPS térképadatok és szoftverek; Kézi és PDA szoftver; Multimédia és tervező szoftver; Hálózati szoftver; Irodai alkalmazás szoftver; Operációs rendszerek; Lemezek visszaállítása
zh-TW: 軟體 > 電腦軟體: 防毒軟體/資安軟體; 人工智慧 (AI) 軟體; 商業生產力軟體; 編譯器/軟體開發工具; 電腦工具程式; 電子字典和翻譯軟體; 教育用軟體; 財稅會計軟體; GPS 地圖資料和軟體; 手持裝置/PDA 軟體; 多媒體與設計軟體; 網路軟體; 辦公室應用程式; 作業系統; 還原光碟
vi: Phần mềm > Phần mềm máy tính: Phần mềm bảo mật và chống virus; Phần mềm trí tuệ nhân tạo (AI); Phần mềm kinh doanh và tăng năng suất; Trình biên dịch & công cụ lập trình; Phần mềm tiện ích và bảo trì máy tính; Phần mềm dịch và từ điển; Phần mềm giáo dục; Phần mềm tài chính, thuế và kế toán; Phần mềm & dữ liệu bản đồ GPS; Phần mềm thiết bị cầm tay & PDA; Phần mềm đa phương tiện & phần mềm thiết kế; Phần mềm mạng máy tính; Phần mềm ứng dụng văn phòng; Hệ điều hành; Đĩa phục hồi cài đặt gốc
ro-RO: Software > Software de calculator: Software antivirus și de securitate; Software pe bază de inteligență artificială (AI).; Software pentru afaceri și productivitate; Compilatoare și instrumente de programare; Software utilitar pentru calculatoare și software de întreținere; Dicționare și programe software de traducere; Software educațional; Software financiar, fiscal și contabil; Date și software pentru hărți GPS; Software pentru unități portabile și PDA; Software multimedia și de proiectare; Software de rețea; Software pentru aplicații de birou; Sisteme de operare; Software pentru recuperarea unităților
es: Software > Software informático: Software de seguridad y antivirus; Software de inteligencia artificial (IA); Software corporativo y de productividad; Herramientas de compilación y programación; Utilidades y software de mantenimiento para computadoras; Software de diccionario y traducción; Software educativo; Software de contabilidad; Software y datos de mapa para GPS; Software para PDA y dispositivos portátiles; Software de diseño y multimedia; Software de red; Software de aplicaciones ofimáticas; Sistemas operativos; Discos de restauración
pt-BR: Software > Software de computador: Antivírus e software de segurança; Software de Inteligência Artificial (IA); Software de negócios e de produtividade; Compiladores e ferramentas de programação; Software de manutenção e utilitários para computadores; Dicionário e software de tradução; Software educativo; Software de contabilidade e impostos; Dados e software para mapas de GPS; Handheld e software de PDA; Software de multimídia e design; Software de rede; Software de aplicativo de escritório; Sistemas operacionais; Discos de restauração
nb: Programvare > Dataprogramvare: Antivirus- og sikkerhetsprogramvare; Programvare for kunstig intelligens (KI).; Forretnings- og produktivitetsprogramvare; Compilere og programmeringsverktøy; Dataverktøy og vedlikeholdsprogrammer; Ordbøker og oversettelsesprogrammer; Utdanningsprogrammer; Finans-, skatt- og regnskapsprogramvare; GPS-kartdata og -programvare; Programvare for håndholdte enheter og PDA-er; Multimedia- og designprogramvare; Nettverksprogramvare; Kontorprogramvare; Operativsystemer; Gjenoppretting av disker
nl: Software > Computersoftware: Antivirus- en beveiligingssoftware; Software voor kunstmatige intelligentie (AI).; Bedrijfs- en productiviteitssoftware; Compilers en programmeerhulpmiddelen; Computerprogramma's en onderhoudssoftware; Woordenboeken- en vertaalsoftware; Educatieve software; Belastingsoftware; GPS-kaartgegevens en -software; Handheld- en PDA-software; Software voor multimedia en design; Netwerksoftware; Kantoorsoftware; Besturingssystemen; Herstelschijven
fr: Logiciels > Logiciels informatiques: Antivirus et logiciels de sécurité; Logiciel d’intelligence artificielle (IA); Logiciels d'entreprise et de productivité; Outils de compilation et de programmation; Logiciels utilitaires et de maintenance; Logiciels dictionnaires et traducteurs; Logiciels éducatifs; Logiciels de comptabilité; Logiciels et données cartographiques GPS; Logiciels pour PDA et ordinateurs de poche; Graphisme et multimédia; Logiciels réseau; Logiciels bureautiques; Systèmes d'exploitation; Disques de restauration
lt-LT: Programinė įranga > Kompiuterių programinė įranga: Antivirusinė ir saugos programinė įranga; Dirbtinio intelekto (DI) programinė įranga; Verslo ir produktyvumo programinė įranga; Kompiliatoriai ir programavimo įrankiai; Kompiuterių paslaugų ir techninės priežiūros programinė įranga; Žodynai ir vertimo programinė įranga; Mokomoji programinė įranga; Finansų, mokesčių ir apskaitos programinė įranga; GPS žemėlapių duomenys ir programinė įranga; Delninių ir PDA kompiuterių programinė įranga; Multimedijos ir dizaino programinė įranga; Tinklo programinė įranga; Biuro programinė įranga; Operacinės sistemos; Atkūrimo diskai
da: Software > Computersoftware: Antivirus- og sikkerhedssoftware; Software til kunstig intelligens (AI); Forretnings- og produktivitetssoftware; Compilere og programmeringsværktøjer; Software til computervedligeholdelse; Ordbøger og oversættelsessoftware; Uddannelsessoftware; Software til økonomi, moms og regnskab; GPS-kortdata og -software; Software til håndholdte enheder og PDA'er; Multimedie- og designsoftware; Netværkssoftware; Kontorsystemer; Operativsystemer; Gendannelsesdiske
pt-PT: Software > Software de computador: Software de segurança e antivírus; Software de Inteligência Artificial (IA); Software de produtividade e negócios; Ferramentas de programação e compiladores; Software de manutenção e utilitários informáticos; Software de tradução e dicionários; Software educativo; Software de contabilidade, fiscal e financeiro; Software e dados de mapas de GPS; Software de PDA e portáteis; Software de design e multimédia; Software de redes; Software de aplicação empresarial; Sistemas operativos; Discos de restauro
ru: Программное обеспечение > Программное обеспечение для компьютеров: Антивирусное программное обеспечение; Программное обеспечение на базе искусственного интеллекта; Программное обеспечение для работы и бизнеса; Компиляторы и инструменты программирования; Утилиты и служебное программное обеспечение для компьютеров; Программное обеспечение для переводов и словари; Программное обеспечение для обучения; Финансовое, бухгалтерское и налоговое программное обеспечение; Программное обеспечение для GPS-навигации и карты; Программное обеспечение для КПК; Программное обеспечение для дизайна и обработки мультимедиа; Сетевое программное обеспечение; Офисное программное обеспечение; Операционные системы; Диски для восстановления системы
el: Λογισμικό > Λογισμικό υπολογιστών: Λογισμικό προστασίας και ασφάλειας; Λογισμικό τεχνητής νοημοσύνης (AI); Λογισμικό επιχειρήσεων & παραγωγικότητας; Μεταγλωττιστές & εργαλεία προγραμματισμού; Λογισμικό συντήρησης & βοηθητικών εφαρμογών; Λογισμικό λεξικών & μετάφρασης; Εκπαιδευτικό λογισμικό; Λογισμικό οικονομικών, φορολογικών & λογιστικών; Λογισμικό & δεδομένα χαρτών GPS; Λογισμικό χειροκίνητων συσκευών & PDA; Λογισμικό πολυμέσων & σχεδίασης; Λογισμικό δικτύων; Λογισμικό εφαρμογών γραφείου; Λειτουργικά συστήματα; Δίσκοι επαναφοράς
bg-BG: Софтуер > Компютърен софтуер: Антивирусен и защитен софтуер; Софтуер за изкуствен интелект (AI); Софтуер за бизнес и производителност; Компилатори и инструменти за програмиране; Компютърни помощни програми и софтуер за поддръжка; Софтуер за речник и превод; Образователен софтуер; Финансов, данъчен и счетоводен софтуер; GPS картографски данни и софтуер; Ръчен и PDA софтуер; Софтуер за мултимедия и дизайн; Мрежов софтуер; Офис приложен софтуер; Операционни системи; Дискове за възстановяване на системата
th: ซอฟต์แวร์ > ซอฟต์แวร์คอมพิวเตอร์: ซอฟต์แวร์ป้องกันไวรัสและความปลอดภัย; ซอฟต์แวร์ปัญญาประดิษฐ์ (AI); ซอฟต์แวร์ทางธุรกิจและประสิทธิภาพ; เครื่องมือคอมไพล์และเขียนโปรแกรม; ซอฟต์แวร์ยูทิลิตีและการบำรุงรักษาคอมพิวเตอร์; ซอฟต์แวร์พจนานุกรมและการแปล; ซอฟต์แวร์เพื่อการศึกษา; ซอฟต์แวร์ทางการเงิน ภาษี และบัญชี; ข้อมูลและซอฟต์แวร์แผนที่ GPS; ซอฟต์แวร์อุปกรณ์แบบพกพาและ PDA; ซอฟต์แวร์การออกแบบและมัลติมีเดีย; ซอฟต์แวร์เครือข่าย; ซอฟต์แวร์แอปพลิเคชัน Office; ระบบปฏิบัติการ; ดิสก์กู้ระบบ
fi: Ohjelmisto > Tietokoneohjelmisto: Antivirus- ja turvaohjelmistot; Tekoäly (AI) -ohjelmisto; Yritys- ja tuottavuusohjelmistot; Ohjelmointikielen käännös- ja ohjelmointityökalut; Tietokone apuohjelmistot ja järjestelmän ylläpito-ohjelmistot; Sanakirja- ja käännösohjelmistot; Opetusohjelmistot; Talous-, vero- ja kirjanpito-ohjelmistot; GPS-karttatiedot ja -ohjelmistot; Kämmentietokoneen ohjelmistot; Multimedia- ja suunnitteluohjelmisto; Verkko-ohjelmistot; Toimisto-ohjelmistot; Käyttöjärjestelmät; Tallennuslevyt